Virginia statutes. Title 16.1. Courts Not of Record.
Article 4. Immediate Custody, Arrest, Detention and Shelter Care.

§ 16.1-246.
When and how child may be taken into immediate custody.

No child may be taken into immediate custody except:

With a detention order issued by the judge, the intake officer or the clerk, when authorized by the judge, of the juvenile and domestic relations district court in accordance with the provisions of this law or with a warrant issued by a magistrate; or

When a child is alleged to be in need of services or supervision and (i) there is a clear and substantial danger to the child’s life or health or (ii) the assumption of custody is necessary to ensure the child’s appearance before the court; or

When, in the presence of the officer who makes the arrest, a child has committed an act designated a crime under the law of this Commonwealth, or an ordinance of any city, county, town or service district, or under federal law and the officer believes that such is necessary for the protection of the public interest; or

When there is probable cause to believe that a child has committed an offense which if committed by an adult would be a felony; or

When a law-enforcement officer has probable cause to believe that a person committed to the Department of Juvenile Justice as a child has run away or that a child has escaped from a jail or detention home; or

When a law-enforcement officer has probable cause to believe a child has run away from a residential, child-caring facility or home in which he had been placed by the court, the local department of social services or a licensed child welfare agency; or

When a law-enforcement officer has probable cause to believe that a child (i) has run away from home or (ii) is without adult supervision at such hours of the night and under such circumstances that the law-enforcement officer reasonably concludes that there is a clear and substantial danger to the child’s welfare; or

When a child is believed to be in need of inpatient treatment for mental illness as provided in §

16.1-340

.

C1.

When a child has committed a misdemeanor offense involving (i) shoplifting in violation of §

18.2-103

, (ii) assault and battery or (iii) carrying a weapon on school property in violation of §

18.2-308.1

and, although the offense was not committed in the presence of the officer who makes the arrest, the arrest is based on probable cause on reasonable complaint of a person who observed the alleged offense; or

History.

Code 1950, § 16.1-194; 1956, c. 555; 1958, c. 344; 1974, cc. 585, 671; 1977, c. 559; 1978, cc. 643, 740; 1979, c. 701; 1981, c. 487; 1982, c. 683; 1985, c. 540; 1990, cc. 635, 642, 743, 744, 975; 2002, c. 747.

Cross references.

As to bail for juveniles taken into custody pursuant to this section, see §

19.2-119

et seq.

As to recognizances for juveniles taken into custody pursuant to this section, see §

19.2-135

et seq.

As to local boards of social services accepting temporary custody of persons under 18 years of age taken into custody pursuant to §

16.1-246

B or §

63.2-1517

, see §

63.2-900

.

Editor’s note.

Acts 1993, c. 930, cl. 3, as amended by Acts 1994, c. 564, cl. 2, and Acts 1996, c. 616, cl. 4, provides that the amendment to this section by Acts 1993, c. 930, cl. 1, shall become effective June 1, 1998, “if state funds are provided, including all local costs, to carry out the purposes of this bill by the General Assembly.” The funding was not provided.

The 2002 amendments.

The 2002 amendment by c. 747, effective October 1, 2002, deleted “public welfare or” preceding “social services” in subsection F.

Law Review.

For survey of Virginia law on domestic relations for the year 1974-1975, see 61 Va. L. Rev. 1732 (1975).

For survey of Virginia criminal procedure for the year 1977-1978, see 64 Va. L. Rev. 1419 (1978).

For article, “The Revision of Virginia’s Juvenile Court Law,” see 13 U. Rich. L. Rev. 847 (1979).

For comment, “The Uniform Child Custody Jurisdiction Act in Virginia,” see 14 U. Rich. L. Rev. 435 (1979).

For survey of Virginia law on criminal procedure for the year 1978-1979, see 66 Va. L. Rev. 261 (1980).

For annual survey article on legal issues involving children, see 38 U. Rich. L. Rev. 161 (2003).

For 2003/2004 survey of family and juvenile law, see 39 U. Rich. L. Rev. 241 (2004).

Research References.

Virginia Forms (Matthew Bender). No. 5-154. Shelter Care Order, et seq.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

19 M.J. Warrants, § 2.

§ 16.1-247.
Duties of person taking child into custody.

A person taking a child into custody pursuant to the provisions of subsection A of §

16.1-246

, during such hours as the court is open, shall, with all practicable speed, and in accordance with the provisions of this law and the orders of court pursuant thereto, bring the child to the judge or intake officer of the court and the judge, intake officer or arresting officer shall, in the most expeditious manner practicable, give notice of the action taken, together with a statement of the reasons for taking the child into custody, orally or in writing to the child’s parent, guardian, legal custodian or other person standing in loco parentis.

A person taking a child into custody pursuant to the provisions of subsection B, C, or D of §

16.1-246

, during such hours as the court is open, shall, with all practicable speed, and in accordance with the provisions of this law and the orders of court pursuant thereto:

Release the child to such child’s parents, guardian, custodian or other suitable person able and willing to provide supervision and care for such child and issue oral counsel and warning as may be appropriate; or

Release the child to such child’s parents, guardian, legal custodian or other person standing in loco parentis upon their promise to bring the child before the court when requested; or

If not released, bring the child to the judge or intake officer of the court and, in the most expeditious manner practicable, give notice of the action taken, together with a statement of the reasons for taking the child into custody, in writing to the judge or intake officer, and the judge, intake officer or arresting officer shall give notice of the action taken orally or in writing to the child’s parent, guardian, legal custodian or other person standing in loco parentis. Nothing herein shall prevent the child from being held for the purpose of administering a blood or breath test to determine the alcoholic content of his blood where the child has been taken into custody pursuant to §

18.2-266

.

A person taking a child into custody pursuant to the provisions of subsections E and F of §

16.1-246

, during such hours as the court is open, shall, with all practicable speed and in accordance with the provisions of this law and the orders of court pursuant thereto:

Release the child to the institution, facility or home from which he ran away or escaped; or

If not released, bring the child to the judge or intake officer of the court and, in the most expeditious manner practicable, give notice of the action taken, together with a statement of the reasons for taking the child into custody, in writing to the judge or intake officer, and the judge, intake officer or arresting officer shall give notice of the action taken orally or in writing to the institution, facility or home in which the child had been placed and orally or in writing to the child’s parent, guardian, legal custodian or other person standing in loco parentis.

A person taking a child into custody pursuant to the provisions of subsection A of §

16.1-246

, during such hours as the court is not open, shall with all practicable speed and in accordance with the provisions of this law and the orders of court pursuant thereto:

Release the child taken into custody pursuant to a warrant on bail or recognizance pursuant to Chapter 9 (§

19.2-119

et seq.) of Title 19.2; or

Place the child in a detention home or in shelter care; or

Place the child in a jail subject to the provisions of §

16.1-249

.

A person taking a child into custody pursuant to the provisions of subsection B, C, or D of §

16.1-246

during such hours as the court is not open, shall:

Release the child pursuant to the provisions of subdivision B 1 or B 2 of this section; or

Release the child on bail or recognizance pursuant to Chapter 9 (§

19.2-119

et seq.) of Title 19.2; or

Place the child taken into custody pursuant to subsection B of §

16.1-246

in shelter care after the issuance of a detention order pursuant to §

16.1-255

; or

Place the child taken into custody pursuant to subsection C or D of § 16.1-246 in shelter care or in a detention home after the issuance of a warrant by a magistrate; or

Place the child in a jail subject to the provisions of §

16.1-249

after the issuance of a warrant by a magistrate or after the issuance of a detention order pursuant to §

16.1-255

; or

In addition to any other provisions of this subsection, detain the child for a reasonably necessary period of time in order to administer a breath or blood test to determine the alcohol content of his blood, if such child was taken into custody pursuant to §

18.2-266

.

A person taking a child into custody pursuant to the provisions of subsection E of §

16.1-246

, during such hours as the court is not open, shall:

Release the child to the institution or facility from which he ran away or escaped; or

Detain the child in a detention home or in a jail subject to the provisions of §

16.1-249

after the issuance of a warrant by a magistrate or after the issuance of a detention order pursuant to §

16.1-255

.

A person taking a child into custody pursuant to the provisions of subsection F of §

16.1-246

, during such hours as the court is not open, shall:

Release the child to the facility or home from which he ran away; or

Detain the child in shelter care after the issuance of a detention order pursuant to §

16.1-255

or after the issuance of a warrant by a magistrate.

If a parent, guardian or other custodian fails, when requested, to bring the child before the court as provided in subdivisions B 2 and E 1, the court may issue a detention order directing that the child be taken into custody and be brought before the court.

A law-enforcement officer taking a child into custody pursuant to the provisions of subsection G of §

16.1-246

shall notify the intake officer of the juvenile court of the action taken. The intake officer shall determine if the child’s conduct or situation is within the jurisdiction of the court and if a petition should be filed on behalf of the child. If the intake officer determines that a petition should not be filed, the law-enforcement officer shall as soon as practicable:

Return the child to his home;

Release the child to such child’s parents, guardian, legal custodian or other person standing in loco parentis;

Place the child in shelter care for a period not longer than 24 hours after the issuance of a detention order pursuant to §

16.1-255

; or

Release the child.During the period of detention authorized by this subsection no child shall be confined in any detention home, jail or other facility for the detention of adults.

If a child is taken into custody pursuant to the provisions of subsection B, F, or G of §

16.1-246

by a law-enforcement officer during such hours as the court is not in session and the child is not released or transferred to a facility or institution in accordance with subsection E, G, or I of this section, the child shall be held in custody only so long as is reasonably necessary to complete identification, investigation and processing. The child shall be held under visual supervision in a nonlocked, multipurpose area which is not designated for residential use. The child shall not be handcuffed or otherwise secured to a stationary object.

When an adult is taken into custody pursuant to a warrant, detention order, or capias alleging a delinquent act committed when he was a juvenile, he may be released on bail or recognizance pursuant to Chapter 9 (§

19.2-119

et seq.) of Title 19.2. An intake officer shall have the authority to issue a capias for an adult under the age of 21 who is alleged to have committed, before attaining the age of 18, an offense that would be a crime if committed by an adult.

History.

Code 1950, § 16.1-197; 1956, c. 550; 1958, c. 344; 1973, c. 440; 1974, c. 584; 1975, c. 248; 1977, c. 559; 1978, c. 643; 1979, c. 701; 1984, c. 567; 1992, cc. 728, 830; 2004, cc. 415, 439; 2012, c. 253; 2016, c. 626.

Editor’s note.

Acts 1993, c. 930, cl. 3, as amended by Acts 1994, c. 564, cl. 2, and Acts 1996, c. 616, cl. 4, provides that the amendment to this section by Acts 1993, c. 930, cl. 1, shall become effective June 1, 1998, “if state funds are provided, including all local costs, to carry out the purposes of this bill by the General Assembly.” The funding was not provided.

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendments by cc. 415 and 439 are nearly identical, and
inserted “or after the issuance of a detention order pursuant to §

16.1-255

” in subdivision D 5; added “or after the issuance of a detention order pursuant to §

16.1-255

” at the end of subdivision F 2; and made minor stylistic changes.

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendment by c. 253 inserted “(§

19.2-119

et seq.)” following “Chapter 9” in subdivision E 2; deleted “hereof” following “subdivisions B 2 and E 1” in subsection H; and added subsection K.

The 2016 amendments.

The 2016 amendment by c. 626, in subsection K, inserted “or capias” and made a related change in the first sentence and added the last sentence.

Law Review.

For survey of Virginia criminal procedure for the year 1977-1978, see 64 Va. L. Rev. 1419 (1978).

§ 16.1-247.1.
Custodial interrogation of a child; parental notification and contact.

Prior to any custodial interrogation of a child by a law-enforcement officer who has arrested such child pursuant to subsection C, C1, or D of §

16.1-246

, the child’s parent, guardian, or legal custodian shall be notified of his arrest and the child shall have contact with his parent, guardian, or legal custodian. The notification and contact required by this subsection may be in person, electronically, by telephone, or by video conference.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection A, a custodial interrogation may be conducted if (i) the child’s parent, guardian, or legal custodian is a codefendant in the alleged offense; (ii) the child’s parent, guardian, or legal custodian has been arrested for, has been charged with, or is being investigated for a crime against the child; (iii) if, after every reasonable effort has been made to comply with subsection A, the child’s parent, guardian, or legal custodian cannot be located or refuses contact with the child; or (iv) if the law-enforcement officer conducting the custodial interrogation reasonably believes the information sought is necessary to protect life, limb, or property from an imminent danger and the law-enforcement officer’s questions are limited to those that are reasonably necessary to obtain such information.

History.

2020, c. 480.

§ 16.1-248.
Repealed by Acts 1985, c. 260.

Cross references.

For present provisions as to criteria for detention or shelter care, see §

16.1-248.1

.

§ 16.1-248.1.
Criteria for detention or shelter care.

A juvenile taken into custody whose case is considered by a judge, intake officer or magistrate pursuant to §

16.1-247

shall immediately be released, upon the ascertainment of the necessary facts, to the care, custody and control of such juvenile’s parent, guardian, custodian or other suitable person able and willing to provide supervision and care for such juvenile, either on bail or recognizance pursuant to Chapter 9 (§

19.2-119

et seq.) of Title 19.2 or under such conditions as may be imposed or otherwise. However, at any time prior to an order of final disposition, a juvenile may be detained in a secure facility, pursuant to a detention order or warrant, only upon a finding by the judge, intake officer, or magistrate, that there is probable cause to believe that the juvenile committed the act alleged, and that at least one of the following conditions is met:

The juvenile is alleged to have (a) violated the terms of his probation or parole when the charge for which he was placed on probation or parole would have been a felony or Class 1 misdemeanor if committed by an adult; (b) committed an act that would be a felony or Class 1 misdemeanor if committed by an adult; or (c) violated any of the provisions of §

18.2-308.7

, and there is clear and convincing evidence that:

Considering the seriousness of the current offense or offenses and other pending charges, the seriousness of prior adjudicated offenses, the legal status of the juvenile and any aggravating and mitigating circumstances, the liberty of the juvenile, constitutes a clear and substantial threat to the person or property of others;

The liberty of the juvenile would present a clear and substantial threat of serious harm to such juvenile’s life or health; or

The juvenile has threatened to abscond from the court’s jurisdiction during the pendency of the instant proceedings or has a record of willful failure to appear at a court hearing within the immediately preceding 12 months.

The juvenile has absconded from a detention home or facility where he has been directed to remain by the lawful order of a judge or intake officer.

The juvenile is a fugitive from a jurisdiction outside the Commonwealth and subject to a verified petition or warrant, in which case such juvenile may be detained for a period not to exceed that provided for in §

16.1-323

while arrangements are made to return the juvenile to the lawful custody of a parent, guardian or other authority in another state.

The juvenile has failed to appear in court after having been duly served with a summons in any case in which it is alleged that the juvenile has committed a delinquent act or that the child is in need of services or is in need of supervision; however, a child alleged to be in need of services or in need of supervision may be detained for good cause pursuant to this subsection only until the next day upon which the court sits within the county or city in which the charge against the child is pending, and under no circumstances longer than 72 hours from the time he was taken into custody. If the 72-hour period expires on a Saturday, Sunday, legal holiday or day on which the court is lawfully closed, the 72 hours shall be extended to the next day that is not a Saturday, Sunday, legal holiday or day on which the court is lawfully closed.

The juvenile failed to adhere to the conditions imposed upon him by the court, intake officer or magistrate following his release upon a Class 1 misdemeanor charge or a felony charge.However, no juvenile younger than 11 years of age shall be placed in secure detention unless such juvenile is alleged to have committed one or more of the delinquent acts enumerated in subsection B or C of §

16.1-269.1

.When a juvenile is placed in secure detention, the detention order shall state the offense for which the juvenile is being detained, and, to the extent practicable, other pending and previous charges.

Any juvenile not meeting the criteria for placement in a secure facility shall be released to a parent, guardian or other person willing and able to provide supervision and care under such conditions as the judge, intake officer or magistrate may impose. However, a juvenile may be placed in shelter care if:

The juvenile is eligible for placement in a secure facility;

The juvenile has failed to adhere to the directions of the court, intake officer or magistrate while on conditional release;

The juvenile’s parent, guardian or other person able to provide supervision cannot be reached within a reasonable time;

The juvenile does not consent to return home;

Neither the juvenile’s parent or guardian nor any other person able to provide proper supervision can arrive to assume custody within a reasonable time; or

The juvenile’s parent or guardian refuses to permit the juvenile to return home and no relative or other person willing and able to provide proper supervision and care can be located within a reasonable time.

When a juvenile is detained in a secure facility, the juvenile’s probation officer may review such placement for the purpose of seeking a less restrictive alternative to confinement in that secure facility.

The criteria for continuing the juvenile in detention or shelter care as set forth in this section shall govern the decisions of all persons involved in determining whether the continued detention or shelter care is warranted pending court disposition. Such criteria shall be supported by clear and convincing evidence in support of the decision not to release the juvenile.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to deprive the court of its power to punish a juvenile summarily for contempt for acts set forth in §

18.2-456

, other than acts of disobedience of the court’s dispositional order which are committed outside the presence of the court.

A detention order may be issued pursuant to subdivision A 2 by the committing court or by the court in the jurisdiction from which the juvenile fled or where he was taken into custody.

The court is authorized to detain a juvenile based upon the criteria set forth in subsection A at any time after a delinquency petition has been filed, both prior to adjudication and after adjudication pending final disposition subject to the time limitations set forth in §

16.1-277.1

.

If the intake officer or magistrate releases the juvenile, either on bail or recognizance or under such conditions as may be imposed, no motion to revoke bail, or change such conditions may be made unless (i) the juvenile has violated a term or condition of his release, or is convicted of or taken into custody for an additional offense, or (ii) the attorney for the Commonwealth presents evidence that incorrect or incomplete information regarding the factors in subsection A was relied upon by the intake officer or magistrate establishing the initial terms of release. If the juvenile court releases the juvenile, either on bail or recognizance or under such conditions as may be imposed, over the objection of the attorney for the Commonwealth, the attorney for the Commonwealth may appeal such decision to the circuit court. The order of the juvenile court releasing the juvenile shall remain in effect until the circuit court, Court of Appeals or Supreme Court rules otherwise.

History.

1977, c. 559; 1979, c. 701; 1985, c. 260; 1986, c. 517; 1987, c. 632; 1989, c. 725; 1990, c. 257; 1996, cc. 755, 914; 2000, c. 836; 2001, c. 837; 2002, cc. 55, 359; 2003, cc. 104, 851; 2004, c. 374; 2005, c. 647; 2010, c. 683; 2011, c. 644; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 115.

Cross references.

As to medical records of juvenile in secure facility, see §

16.1-248.3

.

As to punishment for Class 1 misdemeanors, see §

18.2-11

.

The 1996 amendments.

The 1996 amendments by cc. 755 and 914 are identical, and substituted “juvenile” for “child” throughout the section,
substituted “juvenile’s” for “child’s” throughout the section, inserted “Considering the seriousness of the current offense or offenses and other pending charges, the seriousness of prior adjudicated offenses, the legal status of the juvenile and any aggravating and mitigating circumstances” preceding “the release” in subdivision A 1 a, deleted “of this chapter” following “§

16.1-323

” in subdivision A 3, and in subdivision A 4, inserted “or that the child” preceding “is in need of services” and deleted “or she” following “from the time he.”

The 2000 amendments.

The 2000 amendment by c. 836, in subsection A, substituted “a clear and substantial threat” for “an unreasonable danger” near the end of subdivision 1 a, and added the concluding paragraph of the subsection.

The 2001 amendments.

The 2001 amendment by c. 837 inserted “If the seventy-two hour period expires on a Saturday, Sunday, legal holiday or day on which the court is lawfully closed, the seventy-two hours shall be extended to the next day that is not a Saturday, Sunday, legal holiday or day on which the court is lawfully closed” at the end of subdivision A 4.

The 2002 amendments.

The 2002 amendments by cc. 55 and 359 are identical, and added subdivision A 1 a and the subdivision A 1 b designation; and substituted “that” for “which” in subdivision A 1 b.

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendments by cc. 104 and 851 are identical, and in subsection A, inserted “at any time prior to an order of final disposition” near the beginning of the second sentence of the introductory language, and substituted “liberty” for “release” in subdivisions A 1 a and A 1 b; and added subsection F.

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendment by c. 374 inserted subsection C; and redesignated former subsections C through F as present subsections D through G.

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendment by c. 647 added subsection H.

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendment by c. 683 added clause (c) in subdivision A 1 and made a related change.

The 2011 amendments.

The 2011 amendment by c. 644 added the subdivision A 5 designation and the first paragraph therein.

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 115, effective July 1, 2021, inserted the paragraph following subdivision A 5; and substituted “subdivision A 2” for “subdivision 2 of subsection A” in subsection F.

Law Review.

For 1985 survey of Virginia law affecting children, see 19 U. Rich. L. Rev. p. 753 (1985).

For survey on legal issues involving children in Virginia for 1989, see 23 U. Rich. L. Rev. 705 (1989).

For 2000 survey of Virginia criminal law and procedure, see 34 U. Rich. L. Rev. 749 (2000).

For 2000 survey of Virginia law regarding children, see 34 U. Rich. L. Rev. 939 (2000).

For article, “Legal Issues Involving Children,” see 35 U. Rich. L. Rev. 741 (2001).

§ 16.1-248.2.
Mental health screening and assessment for certain juveniles.

Whenever a juvenile is placed in a secure facility pursuant to §

16.1-248.1

, the staff of the facility shall gather such information from the juvenile and the probation officer as is reasonably available and deemed necessary by the facility staff. As part of the intake procedures at each such facility, the staff shall ascertain the juvenile’s need for a mental health assessment. If it is determined that the juvenile needs such an assessment, the assessment shall take place within twenty-four hours of such determination. The community services board serving the jurisdiction where the facility is located shall be responsible for conducting the assessments and shall be compensated from funds appropriated to the Department of Juvenile Justice for this purpose. The Department of Juvenile Justice shall develop criteria and a compensation plan for such assessments.

History.

1996, cc. 755, 914; 1998, c. 434.

The 1998 amendment

added the last two sentences.

Law Review.

For an article, “Legal Issues Involving Children,” see 32 U. Rich. L. Rev. 1345 (1998).

§ 16.1-248.3.
Medical records of juveniles in secure facility.

Whenever a juvenile is placed in a secure facility or a shelter care facility pursuant to §

16.1-248.1

, the director of the facility or his designee shall be entitled to obtain medical records concerning the juvenile from a provider. Prior to using the authority granted by this section to obtain such records, the director of the facility or his designee shall make a reasonable attempt to obtain consent for the release of the records from the juvenile’s parent or legal guardian or, in instances where the juvenile may consent pursuant to §

54.1-2969

, from the juvenile. The director of the facility or his designee may proceed to obtain the records from the provider if such consent is refused or is not readily obtainable and the records are necessary (i) for the provision of health care to the juvenile, (ii) to protect the health and safety of the juvenile or other residents or staff of the facility or (iii) to maintain the security and safety of the facility.

The director or his designee shall document in writing the reason that the records were requested and that a reasonable attempt was made to obtain consent for the release of records and that consent was refused or not readily obtainable.

No person to whom disclosure of records was made pursuant to this section shall redisclose or otherwise reveal the records, beyond the purpose for which such disclosure was made, without first obtaining specific consent to redisclose from the juvenile’s parent or legal guardian or, in instances where the juvenile may consent pursuant to §

54.1-2969

, from the juvenile.

Substance abuse records subject to federal regulations, Confidentiality of Alcohol and Drug Abuse Patient Records, 42 C.F.R. Part 2, shall not be subject to the provisions of this section. The disclosure of results of a test for human immunodeficiency virus shall not be permitted except as provided in §

32.1-36.1

.

The definitions of “provider” and “records” in §

32.1-127.1:03

shall apply to this section.

History.

2003, c. 983.

Law Review.

For annual survey article discussing the state of health care law in Virginia, see 38 U. Rich. L. Rev. 137 (2003).

§ 16.1-249.
Places of confinement for juveniles.

If it is ordered that a juvenile remain in detention or shelter care pursuant to §

16.1-248.1

, such juvenile may be detained, pending a court hearing, in the following places:

An approved foster home or a home otherwise authorized by law to provide such care;

A facility operated by a licensed child welfare agency;

If a juvenile is alleged to be delinquent, a detention home or group home approved by the Department;

Any other suitable place designated by the court and approved by the Department;

To the extent permitted by federal law, a separate juvenile detention facility located upon the site of an adult regional jail facility established by any county, city or any combination thereof constructed after 1994, approved by the Department of Juvenile Justice and certified by the Board of Juvenile Justice for the holding and detention of juveniles.A juvenile younger than 11 years of age who is alleged to have committed one or more of the delinquent acts enumerated in subsection B or C of §

16.1-269.1

and who is ordered to remain in detention or shelter care pursuant to §

16.1-248.1

pending a court hearing may only be detained in a place described in subdivision 1, 2, or 4, but under no circumstances shall such juvenile be detained pursuant to this section in a secure detention facility.

No juvenile shall be detained or confined in any jail or other facility for the detention of adult offenders or persons charged with crime except as provided in subsection D, E, F or G.

The official in charge of a jail or other facility for the detention of adult offenders or persons charged with crime shall inform the court immediately when a juvenile who is or appears to be under the age of 18 years is received at the facility, and shall deliver him to the court upon request, or transfer him to a detention facility designated by the court.

When a case is transferred to the circuit court in accordance with the provisions of subsection A of §

16.1-269.1

and an order is entered by the circuit court in accordance with §

16.1-269.6

, or in accordance with the provisions of §

16.1-270

where the juvenile has waived the jurisdiction of the district court, or when the district court has certified a charge to the grand jury pursuant to subsection B or C of §

16.1-269.1

, the juvenile, if in confinement, shall be placed in a juvenile secure facility, unless the court determines that the juvenile is a threat to the security or safety of the other juveniles detained or the staff of the facility, in which case the court may transfer the juvenile to a jail or other facility for the detention of adults, provided that the facility is approved by the State Board of Local and Regional Jails for the detention of juveniles.

If, in the judgment of the custodian, a juvenile has demonstrated that he is a threat to the security or safety of the other juveniles detained or the staff of the home or facility, the judge shall determine whether such juvenile should be transferred to another juvenile facility or, if the child is 14 years of age or older, a jail or other facility for the detention of adults, provided that (i) the detention is in a room or ward entirely separate and removed from adults, (ii) adequate supervision is provided, and (iii) the facility is approved by the State Board of Local and Regional Jails for detention of juveniles.

If, in the judgment of the custodian, it has been demonstrated that the presence of a juvenile in a facility creates a threat to the security or safety of the other juveniles detained or the staff of the home or facility, the custodian may transfer the juvenile to another juvenile facility, or, if the child is 14 years of age or older, a jail or other facility for the detention of adults pursuant to the limitations of clauses (i), (ii) and (iii) of subsection E for a period not to exceed six hours prior to a court hearing and an additional six hours after the court hearing unless a longer period is ordered pursuant to subsection E.

If a juvenile 14 years of age or older is charged with an offense which, if committed by an adult, would be a felony or Class 1 misdemeanor, and the judge or intake officer determines that secure detention is needed for the safety of the juvenile or the community, such juvenile may be detained for a period not to exceed six hours prior to a court hearing and six hours after the court hearing in a temporary lock-up room or ward for juveniles while arrangements are completed to transfer the juvenile to a juvenile facility. Such room or ward may be located in a building which also contains a jail or other facility for the detention of adults, provided that (i) such room or ward is totally separate and removed from adults or juveniles transferred to the circuit court pursuant to Article 7 (§

16.1-269.1

et seq.), (ii) constant supervision is provided, and (iii) the facility is approved by the State Board of Local and Regional Jails for the detention of juveniles. The State Board of Local and Regional Jails is authorized and directed to prescribe minimum standards for temporary lock-up rooms and wards based on the requirements set out in this subsection.

If a judge, intake officer or magistrate orders the predispositional detention of persons 18 years of age or older, such detention shall be in an adult facility; however, if the predispositional detention is ordered for a violation of the terms and conditions of release from a juvenile correctional center, the judge, intake officer or magistrate may order such detention be in a juvenile facility.

The Departments of Corrections, Juvenile Justice and Criminal Justice Services shall assist the localities or combinations thereof in implementing this section and ensuring compliance herewith.

G1.

Any juvenile who has been ordered detained in a secure detention facility pursuant to §

16.1-248.1

may be held incident to a court hearing (i) in a court holding cell for a period not to exceed six hours, provided that the juvenile is entirely separate and removed from detained adults, or (ii) in a nonsecure area, provided that constant supervision is provided.

History.

1977, c. 559; 1979, c. 655; 1983, c. 336; 1985, c. 260; 1988, c. 886; 1989, c. 557; 1993, c. 435; 1994, cc. 859, 904, 949; 1995, cc. 746, 748, 798, 802; 1996, cc. 755, 914; 1998, cc. 576, 830; 2002, c. 558; 2004, cc. 415, 439; 2010, c. 739; 2018, cc. 36, 73; 2020, c. 759; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 115.

Cross references.

As to punishment for Class 1 felonies, see §

18.2-10

.

As to punishment for Class 1 misdemeanors, see §

18.2-11

.

The 1996 amendments.

The 1996 amendments by cc. 755 and 914 are identical, and added subdivision A 5, inserted “Except for placement under subsection A 5” preceding “the official” in subsection C, in subsection D, inserted “subsection A of” preceding “§

16.1-269.1

” and inserted “or when the district court has certified a charge to the grand jury pursuant to subsection B or C of §

16.1-269.1

” following “has waived the jurisdiction of the district court,” and substituted “release from a juvenile correctional center” for “release from a learning center” in subsection H.

The 1998 amendments.

The 1998 amendment by c. 576 substituted “Juvenile Justice” for “Corrections” following “Board of” in subdivision A 5; deleted “Except for placement under subsection A 5” preceding “The official in charge” in subsection C; and substituted “clauses (i), (ii) and (iii) of subsection E” for “subdivisions E (i), (ii) and (iii)” in subsection F.

The 1998 amendment by c. 830, effective April 22, 1998, substituted “subdivision A 5” for “subsection A 5” in subsection C; in subsection F, substituted “clauses (i), (ii) and (iii) of subsection E” for “subdivisions E (i), (ii) and (iii)” and added the language beginning “prior to a court” and ending “ordered pursuant to subsection E”; and substituted “not to exceed six hours prior to a court hearing and six hours after the court hearing” for “no longer than six hours” in the first sentence of subsection G.

The 2002 amendments.

The 2002 amendment by c. 558 rewrote subsection H, which fomerly read: “A judge may order the predispositional detention of persons eighteen years of age or older (i) in a juvenile facility only for a violation of the terms and conditions of release from a juvenile correctional center or (ii) in an adult facility.”

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendments by cc. 415 and 439 are identical, and twice inserted “intake officer or magistrate” in subsection H and made minor stylistic changes.

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendment by c. 739 substituted “shall be placed in a juvenile secure facility, unless the court determines that the juvenile is a threat to the security or safety of the other juveniles detained or the staff of the facility, in which case the court may transfer the juvenile” for “may be transferred” in subsection D.

The 2018 amendments.

The 2018 amendments by cc. 36 and 73 are identical, and substituted “provided that the facility is approved by the State Board of Corrections for the detention of juveniles” for “and need no longer be entirely separate and removed from adults” in subsection D; and made stylistic changes.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 759, substituted “State Board of Local and Regional Jails” for “State Board of Corrections” wherever it appears.

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 115, effective July 1, 2021, deleted “in” preceding “a detention home” in subdivision A 3; and added the paragraph following subdivision A 5.

Law Review.

For 1985 survey of Virginia law affecting children, see 19 U. Rich. L. Rev. p. 753 (1985).

For survey on legal issues involving children in Virginia for 1989, see 23 U. Rich. L. Rev. 705 (1989).

For an article, “Legal Issues Involving Children,” see 32 U. Rich. L. Rev. 1345 (1998).